Washington statutes.
RCW 43.180.330

Revenue refunding bonds.

The commission may provide by resolution for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any obligations issued for a nonprofit facility, including the payment of any redemption premium thereon and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption or maturity of the revenue bonds and, if considered advisable by the commission, for the additional purpose of financing improvements, extensions, or enlargements to the nonprofit facility for another nonprofit facility. The issuance of the revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and other details thereof, the rights of the owners thereof, and the rights, duties, and obligations of the commission in respect to the same shall be governed by this chapter insofar as applicable.

[ 1990 c 167 s 5.]